Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB525.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 186.577 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The following persons shall submit to a test of visual acuity and visual field at
the time of application or renewal:
1. All persons applying for an initial [or renewal ]operator's license;
2. All persons applying for an initial [or renewal ]instruction permit;[ and]
3. All persons applying for a renewal operator's license who are sixty-
five (65) years of age or older on the date of the renewal application;
and
4.[3.] Any person required to complete an examination under KRS 186.635.
(2) Vision testing under this section shall be administered to any person:
(a) Applying for an initial operator's license, an initial instruction permit, or
reinstatement of a license when vision must be tested as required in KRS
186.480:
1. Prior to the time of application under subsection (5) of this section; or
2. By Kentucky State Police at the time of application;
(b) Applying for operator's license renewal or instruction permit renewal:
1. Prior to the time of application under subsection (5) of this section; or
2. By the Transportation Cabinet at the time of application; or
(c) Identified in Kentucky administrative regulations promulgated by the
Transportation Cabinet or the Kentucky State Police as being required to
undergo the exam required by KRS 186.480.
(3) (a) Persons whose visual acuity is 20/40 or better and who meet or exceed the
visual field standard established by the Transportation Cabinet without
corrective lenses shall not have a restriction placed on their driving privileges.
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/29/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1953
(b) Persons whose visual acuity is 20/40 or better and who meet or exceed the
visual field standard established by the Transportation Cabinet with corrective
lenses shall have their driving privileges restricted to mandate the use of the
corrective lenses.
(c) If a person fails to meet a 20/40 visual acuity standard or the visual field
standard established by the cabinet, the person shall be referred to a vision
specialist for examination.
(4) A person referred to a vision specialist under subsection (3) of this section whose
visual acuity is 20/60 or better and who meets or exceeds the visual field standard
established by the cabinet shall be eligible to test for an instruction permit or
operator's license, or shall be eligible for operator's license renewal. If corrective
lenses were prescribed by the vision specialist, the person's driving privileges shall
be restricted to mandate the use of the corrective lenses.
(5) Vision tests administered under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall be deemed to
meet the testing provisions outlined in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, if the
person submits a driver vision testing form that complies with the provisions of
subsection (6) of this section and the form has been completed by:
(a) A vision specialist; or
(b) An osteopath, physician, or advanced practice registered nurse who is
credentialed by the cabinet to perform vision testing under this section.
(6) All driver vision testing forms completed under subsection (5) of this section shall:
(a) Attest that the applicant meets or exceeds the visual acuity standard and visual
field standard established by the cabinet;
(b) Only be valid if the vision specialist or the credentialed osteopath,
credentialed physician, or credentialed advanced practice registered nurse
signed and completed the vision testing form less than twelve (12) months
prior to the date of application or renewal;
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/29/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1953
(c) State whether the driving privileges of the applicant shall be restricted to
mandate the use of corrective lenses; and
(d) Clearly indicate that the vision testing under this section is a screening for
minimum vision standards established in this section and is not a complete
eye examination.
(7) Any person seeking application or permit under subsection (1) of this section shall
attest that he or she has submitted to and passed the visual acuity and visual field
tests required under this section.
(8) Any person renewing an operator's license under KRS 186.416 shall be exempt
from the vision testing requirements outlined in this section.
(9) Persons who meet the requirements of KRS 186.578 and are issued operator's
licenses under KRS 186.579 shall:
(a) Have their driving privileges restricted to the use of a bioptic telescopic
device; and
(b) Be exempt from this section.
(10) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to
KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section, including but not
limited to establishing visual field standards, the creation of a driver vision testing
form, and establishing a credentialing process for osteopaths, physicians, and
advanced practice registered nurses to conduct vision testing under this section.
(11) The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to
KRS Chapter 13A to:
(a) Implement a system for electronic transmission of driver vision testing forms
and accompanying documentation; and
(b) Assess a fee to an applicant to cover the administrative costs of performing
on-site vision testing. Any funds received from this fee shall be deposited into
the photo license account established in KRS 174.056.
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/29/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1953
Section 2. Whereas the requirement for vision testing on operator's license
renewals for all drivers has placed an additional burden on an already overtaxed driver
licensing system, and it is increasingly difficult to obtain an operator's license, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by
the Governor or upon it otherwise becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/29/2026 11:16 AM Jacketed